Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.130

List of areas requiring permits.

The department shall publish annually and update as necessary a list of those areas where permits are required to protect historic archaeological sites on aquatic lands.

[ 1995 c 399 s 17; 1988 c 124 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.